North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Article 17. Provider Sponsored Organization Licensing.

§§ 131E-275 through 131E-314.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021.

History.

S. 131E-275; 1998-227, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 15(a); repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-276; 1998-227, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 15(a); repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-277; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-278; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-279; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-280; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-281; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-282; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-283; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-284; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-285; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-286; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-287; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-288; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-289; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-290; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-291; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-292; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-293; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-294; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-295; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-296; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-297; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-298; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-299; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-300; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-301; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-302; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-303; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-304; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-305; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-307; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-308; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-309; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-310; 1998-227, s. 1; 1999-272, s. 2; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-311; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-312; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-313; 1998-227, s. 1; repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021. s. 131E-314; 1998-227, ss. 4, 5; 2011-291, s. 2.49; 2019-81, s. 15(a); repealed by 2021-62, s. 4.10, effective June 29, 2021.